Missouri, session 2026, HB2293.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 195, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 195.1000, to read as follows:
195.1000. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, ivermectin tablets and
hydroxychloroquine tablets shall be available to the public through over-the-counter
purchase in this state without a prescription or consultation with a pharmacist or other
health care professional.
Section B. Because immediate action is necessary to ensure the public has adequate
access to ivermectin tablets and hydroxychloroquine tablets, section A of this act is deemed
necessary for the immediate preservation of the public health, welfare, peace, and safety, and
is hereby declared to be an emergency act within the meaning of the constitution, and section
A of this act shall be in full force and effect upon its passage and approval.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.